Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DULUTH INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT.new text end new text begin (a) $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the state airports fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the Duluth Airport Authority to design, construct, furnish, and equip a new air traffic control tower and base building to include office spaces, office support spaces, equipment rooms, work spaces, and logistic support spaces at the Duluth International Airport. This project includes site and associated site support area preparation, including demolition of obsolete buildings, construction and installation of utilities and a stormwater retention system, and existing fuel tank replacement. A portion of this appropriation must be used as a match to federal funding for the project. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner must not use any amount of this appropriation for administrative costs. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation under Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (1). This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end